Tennessee statutes. Title 65 Public Utilities and Carriers
Chapter 2

Procedure Before the Tennessee Public Utility Commission

65-2-101. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Commission” means the Tennessee public utility commission;

“Contested case” means all proceedings before the commission in which the legal rights, duties, or privileges of specific parties are determined after a hearing before the commission; provided, that the fixing of rates shall be deemed a contested case rather than a rule-making proceeding; and

“Rule” means every regulation, or statement of policy, or interpretation of general application and future effect, including the amendment or repeal thereof, adopted by the commission, whether with or without a prior hearing, to implement or make specific the laws enforced or administered by it, or to govern its organization or procedures, but does not include regulations concerning only the internal management of the commission which do not directly affect the rights or procedures available to the public.

Acts 1953, ch. 162, § 1 (Williams, § 5501.24); impl. am. Acts 1955, ch. 69, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-201; Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 9; 2017, ch. 94, §§ 48, 50.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment deleted definition “Authority” which read, “‘Authority’” means the Tennessee regulatory authority;”; added definition “Commission” and substituted “commission” for “authority” in definitions “Contested case” and “Rule.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

Cross-References. Procedure applicable to department of transportation, § 42-2-224.

Law Reviews.

Symposium -- Memphis in the Law: The Process of Determining What Process is Due: The Continuing Saga of Memphis Light, Gas & Water Division v. Craft, 436 U.S. 1 (1978) (Donna Harkness), 41 U. Mem. L. Rev. 745 (2011).

The Development of the Tennessee Uniform Administrative Procedures Act (Valerius Sanford), 6 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 151 (1976).

Attorney General Opinions. Applicability to Welding Engineer Program of American Welding Society, OAG 97-155, 1997 Tenn. AG LEXIS 176 (11/14/97).

65-2-102. Adoption, effective date and publication of rules.

The commission is empowered and directed to adopt rules in the following circumstances and in the following manner:

The commission shall adopt rules governing the procedure prescribed or authorized by this chapter or by any other statute applicable to the commission; these rules shall include, but shall not be limited to, rules of practice before the commission, together with forms and instructions;

The commission is empowered to adopt rules implementing, interpreting, or making specific the various laws which it enforces or administers; provided, that the commission shall have no power to vary or deviate from those laws, nor to extend its power or jurisdiction to matters not provided for in those laws;

The commission may adopt, amend, or repeal such rules on its own motion, or on the petition of any interested person. The commission shall prescribe by rule the form of such petitions and the procedure for their submission, consideration and disposition; provided, that the commission shall abide by any such rule adopted by it, until it shall have been changed in the manner provided for in this chapter; and

Prior to the adoption of any rule, or to the amendment or repeal of any rule, the commission shall, so far as practicable and in such manner as it deems expedient, publish or otherwise circulate notice of its intended action, and afford interested persons opportunity to submit data or argument in such manner as the commission shall prescribe; provided, that no person shall be entitled to challenge the validity of such a rule, or the amendment or repeal of such a rule, on the grounds that such person failed to receive such notice or was not given an opportunity to be heard.

Rules adopted by the commission shall take effect at such date as the commission shall direct. The commission shall compile and publish all rules adopted by it in such manner and in such form as it deems expedient. The commission shall also furnish copies of such compilations of its rules to all persons requesting same at a price fixed by the commission to cover publication and mailing costs.

Acts 1953, ch. 162, §§ 2, 3 (Williams §§ 5501.25, 5501.26); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 65-202, 65-203; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-2-103; Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 9; 2017, ch. 94, § 50.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “commission” for “authority” throughout the section.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

Law Reviews.

Report on Administrative Law to the Tennessee Law Revision Commission, 20 Vand. L. Rev. 777 (1967).

Symposium -- Memphis in the Law: The Process of Determining What Process is Due: The Continuing Saga of Memphis Light, Gas & Water Division v. Craft, 436 U.S. 1 (1978) (Donna Harkness), 41 U. Mem. L. Rev. 745 (2011).

Attorney General Opinions. Promulgation of rules for certification of competing local telecommunications providers, OAG 94-144, 1994 Tenn. AG LEXIS 170 (12/16/94).

65-2-103. Petitions to be in writing — Filing fees.

Every petition filed with the commission shall be in writing and shall be accompanied by a filing fee of twenty-five dollars ($25.00).

Any petition filed on behalf of multiple parties shall be accompanied by a payment of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for each party.

Acts 1986, ch. 862, § 1; 1995, ch. 305, § 9; 2017, ch. 94, § 50.

Code Commission Notes.

Former § 65-2-103, concerning the effective date and publication of rules, was transferred to § 65-2-102(b) by the code commission.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “commission” for “authority” near the beginning of (a).

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

Law Reviews.

Symposium -- Memphis in the Law: The Process of Determining What Process is Due: The Continuing Saga of Memphis Light, Gas & Water Division v. Craft, 436 U.S. 1 (1978) (Donna Harkness), 41 U. Mem. L. Rev. 745 (2011).

65-2-104. Petition for declaratory ruling by the commission.

On the petition of any interested person, the commission may issue a declaratory ruling with respect to the applicability to any person, property, or state of facts of any rule or statute enforceable by it or with respect to the meaning and scope of any order of the commission. A declaratory ruling, if issued after argument and stated to be binding, is binding between the commission and the petitioner on the state of facts alleged in the petition, unless it is altered or set aside by a court in a proper proceeding. Such rulings are subject to review in the chancery court of Davidson County in the manner provided in this chapter for the review of decisions in contested cases. The commission shall prescribe by rule the form for such petitions and the procedure for their submission, consideration, and disposition.

Acts 1953, ch. 162, § 5 (Williams, § 5501.28); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-204; Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 9; 2017, ch. 94, § 50.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “commission” for “authority” throughout the section.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

Law Reviews.

Symposium -- Memphis in the Law: The Process of Determining What Process is Due: The Continuing Saga of Memphis Light, Gas & Water Division v. Craft, 436 U.S. 1 (1978) (Donna Harkness), 41 U. Mem. L. Rev. 745 (2011).

65-2-105. Declaratory judgment on validity of rules.

The validity of any rule of the commission may be determined upon petition for a declaratory judgment thereon addressed to the chancery court of Davidson County, when it appears that the rule, or its threatened application, interferes with or impairs, or threatens to interfere with or impair, the legal rights or privileges of the petitioner. The commission shall be made a party to all such proceedings. Such declaratory judgment may be rendered whether or not the petitioner has first requested the commission to pass upon the validity of the rule in question. In passing on such rules, the court shall declare the rule invalid only if it finds that it violates constitutional provisions or exceeds the statutory authority of the commission or was adopted without compliance with the rulemaking procedures provided for in this chapter.

Acts 1953, ch. 162, § 4 (Williams, § 5501.27); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-205; Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 9; 2017, ch. 94, § 50.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “commission” for “authority” throughout the section.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

Law Reviews.

Symposium -- Memphis in the Law: The Process of Determining What Process is Due: The Continuing Saga of Memphis Light, Gas & Water Division v. Craft, 436 U.S. 1 (1978) (Donna Harkness), 41 U. Mem. L. Rev. 745 (2011).

Attorney General Opinions. Applicability to Welding Engineer Program of American Welding Society, OAG 97-155, 1997 Tenn. AG LEXIS 176 (11/14/97).

65-2-106. Show cause orders.

The commission is empowered and authorized in the exercise of the powers and jurisdiction conferred upon it by law to issue orders on its own motion citing persons under its jurisdiction to appear before it and show cause why the commission should not take such action as the commission shall indicate in its show cause order appears justified by preliminary investigation made by the commission under the powers conferred upon it by law. All such show cause orders shall fully and specifically state the grounds and bases thereof, and the respondents named in the orders shall be given an opportunity to fully reply thereto. Show cause proceedings shall otherwise follow the provisions of this chapter with reference to contested cases, except where otherwise specifically provided.

Acts 1953, ch. 162, § 7 (Williams, § 5501.30); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-206; Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 9; 2017, ch. 94, § 50.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “commission” for “authority” four times in the first sentence.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

Law Reviews.

Symposium -- Memphis in the Law: The Process of Determining What Process is Due: The Continuing Saga of Memphis Light, Gas & Water Division v. Craft, 436 U.S. 1 (1978) (Donna Harkness), 41 U. Mem. L. Rev. 745 (2011).

Collateral References.

Federal control as affecting right to enforce order. 4 A.L.R. 1680, 8 A.L.R. 969, 10 A.L.R. 956, 11 A.L.R. 1450, 14 A.L.R. 234, 19 A.L.R. 678, 52 A.L.R. 296.

65-2-107. Parties to contested cases.

All persons having a right under the provisions of the laws applicable to the commission to appear and be heard in contested cases as defined in this chapter shall be deemed parties to such proceedings for the purposes of this chapter. In addition, the commission may upon motion allow any interested person to intervene and become a party to any contested case.

Acts 1953, ch. 162, § 6 (Williams, § 5501.29); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-207; Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 9; 2017, ch. 94, § 50.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “commission” for “authority” throughout the section.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

Law Reviews.

Parties and Claims, 4 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 280 (1974).

Symposium -- Memphis in the Law: The Process of Determining What Process is Due: The Continuing Saga of Memphis Light, Gas & Water Division v. Craft, 436 U.S. 1 (1978) (Donna Harkness), 41 U. Mem. L. Rev. 745 (2011).

65-2-108. Notice and hearing in contested cases.

All parties to contested cases shall be afforded an opportunity for hearing after reasonable notice. The notice shall state the time, place, and issues involved as specifically as may be practicable. At the hearing all parties shall be afforded an opportunity to present evidence and argument in accordance with the rules of the commission; provided, that informal disposition may also be made of any case by stipulation, agreed settlement, consent order, or default; and provided further, that this section shall not be applicable to proceedings otherwise provided for by law.

Acts 1953, ch. 162, § 8 (Williams, § 5501.31); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-208; Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 9; 2017, ch. 94, § 50.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “commission” for “authority” in the third sentence preceding the proviso.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

Law Reviews.

Symposium -- Memphis in the Law: The Process of Determining What Process is Due: The Continuing Saga of Memphis Light, Gas & Water Division v. Craft, 436 U.S. 1 (1978) (Donna Harkness), 41 U. Mem. L. Rev. 745 (2011).

Collateral References.

Representation of another before state public utilities or service commission as involving practice of law. 13 A.L.R.3d 812.

65-2-109. Rules of evidence — Judicial notice — Burden of proof.

In all contested cases:

The commission shall not be bound by the rules of evidence applicable in a court, but it may admit and give probative effect to any evidence which possesses such probative value as would entitle it to be accepted by reasonably prudent persons in the conduct of their affairs; provided, that the commission shall give effect to the rules of privilege recognized by law; and provided further, that the commission may exclude incompetent, irrelevant, immaterial or unduly repetitious evidence;

All evidence, including records and documents in the possession of the commission of which it desires to avail itself, shall be offered and made a part of the record in the case, and no other factual information or evidence shall be considered in the determination of the case. Documentary evidence may be received in the form of copies or excerpts, or by incorporation by reference;

Every party shall have the right of cross-examination of witnesses who testify, and shall have the right to submit rebuttal evidence;

The commission may take notice of judicially cognizable facts and, in addition, may take notice of general, technical, or scientific facts within its specialized knowledge. Parties shall be notified either before or during the hearing, or by reference in preliminary reports or otherwise, of the material so noticed, and they shall be afforded an opportunity to contest the facts so noted. The commission may utilize its experience, technical competence, and specialized knowledge in the evaluation of evidence presented to it; and

The burden of proof shall be on the party or parties asserting the affirmative of an issue; provided, that when the commission has issued a show cause order pursuant to this chapter, the burden of proof shall be on the parties thus directed to show cause.

Acts 1953, ch. 162, § 10 (Williams, § 5501.33); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-209; Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 9; 2017, ch. 94, § 50.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “commission” for “authority” throughout the section.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

Law Reviews.

Report on Administrative Law to the Tennessee Law Revision Commission, 20 Vand. L. Rev. 777 (1967).

Symposium -- Memphis in the Law: The Process of Determining What Process is Due: The Continuing Saga of Memphis Light, Gas & Water Division v. Craft, 436 U.S. 1 (1978) (Donna Harkness), 41 U. Mem. L. Rev. 745 (2011).

65-2-110. Commission reporter — Preparation of official record.

The commission is authorized and directed to employ a competent court reporter or stenographer, whose salary shall be paid out of the general appropriations for the commission, and whose duties shall be to attend all sessions of the commission, to take down and transcribe all testimony offered in contested cases, to prepare the official record of all contested cases, which record shall include all petitions, applications, testimony, exhibits and such other matters as required by law or as the commission may direct, and to perform such other duties as the commission may direct; provided, that the commission may, in its discretion, direct the reporter not to transcribe particular proceedings if it appears that no such transcript is necessary; and provided further, that any party to a contested case may obtain copies of the transcript of testimony made by the commission's reporter upon the payment to the commission of the cost of same at such rate as the commission may determine.

Acts 1953, ch. 162, § 9 (Williams, § 5501.32); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-210; Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 9; 2017, ch. 94, §§ 49, 50.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “commission” for “authority” throughout the section and substituted “commission's” for “authority's” preceding “reporter” in the proviso.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

Cross-References. Section not repealed by Administrative Procedures Act, § 4-5-103.

Transmission of record to reviewing court, § 4-5-322.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 16 Tenn. Juris., Intoxicating Liquors, § 8.

Law Reviews.

Symposium -- Memphis in the Law: The Process of Determining What Process is Due: The Continuing Saga of Memphis Light, Gas & Water Division v. Craft, 436 U.S. 1 (1978) (Donna Harkness), 41 U. Mem. L. Rev. 745 (2011).

The Pre-Hearing Stage of Contested Cases under the Tennessee Uniform Administrative Procedures Act (L. Harold Levinson), 13 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 465 (1984).

65-2-111. Proceedings before hearing examiners.

In any contested case, the commission may direct that the proceedings or any part thereof shall be heard by a hearing examiner to be appointed by the commission; provided, that only the members of the commission and the regular employees of the commission shall be eligible to serve as such examiners. Proceedings before hearing examiners shall be according to this chapter, other applicable laws and the rules of the commission. Whenever a contested case, or any part thereof, is heard by a hearing examiner, the hearing examiner shall make a proposal for decision in writing which shall include findings of fact and conclusions of law made by the hearing examiner. Such proposals for decisions shall be served on all parties of record, and each party who would be adversely affected by the proposed decision shall be given an opportunity to file exceptions and present argument in writing to the commission itself. Before the commission shall enter a final order in such cases, the members thereof shall personally consider the entire record, or such portion thereof as may be cited by the parties, and shall make its decision in the form and manner prescribed by this chapter for decisions in contested cases.

Acts 1953, ch. 162, § 11 (Williams, § 5501.34); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-211; Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 9; 2017, ch. 94, § 50.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “commission” for “authority” throughout the section.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

Law Reviews.

Report on Administrative Law to the Tennessee Law Revision Commission, 20 Vand. L. Rev. 777.

Symposium -- Memphis in the Law: The Process of Determining What Process is Due: The Continuing Saga of Memphis Light, Gas & Water Division v. Craft, 436 U.S. 1 (1978) (Donna Harkness), 41 U. Mem. L. Rev. 745 (2011).

65-2-112. Decisions and orders in contested cases.

Every final decision or order rendered by the commission in a contested case shall be in writing, or stated in the record, and shall contain a statement of the findings of fact and conclusions of law upon which the decision of the commission is based. Copies of such decisions or orders shall be delivered or mailed to each party or to the party's attorney of record.

Acts 1953, ch. 162, § 12 (Williams, § 5501.35); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-212; Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 9; 2017, ch. 94, § 50.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “commission” for “authority” twice in the first sentence.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

Law Reviews.

Contested Cases Under the Tennessee Uniform Administrative Procedures Act (L. Harold Levinson), 6 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 215 (1976).

Symposium -- Memphis in the Law: The Process of Determining What Process is Due: The Continuing Saga of Memphis Light, Gas & Water Division v. Craft, 436 U.S. 1 (1978) (Donna Harkness), 41 U. Mem. L. Rev. 745 (2011).

65-2-113. Publication of decisions and orders in contested cases.

The commission shall each year compile and publish in such manner as it deems expedient such of its decisions or orders as it deems to be of general interest, and shall charge for copies of such compilations a reasonable price to cover the cost of publication and mailing. The commission may also include within such compilations decisions or orders with reference to the rules of the commission.

Acts 1953, ch. 162, § 19 (Williams, § 5501.42); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-213; Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 9; 2017, ch. 94, § 50.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “commission” for “authority” throughout the section.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

Law Reviews.

Symposium -- Memphis in the Law: The Process of Determining What Process is Due: The Continuing Saga of Memphis Light, Gas & Water Division v. Craft, 436 U.S. 1 (1978) (Donna Harkness), 41 U. Mem. L. Rev. 745 (2011).

65-2-114. Petitions for rehearing in contested cases.

Any party to a contested case who deems to be aggrieved by a final order of the commission and who desires to have the same modified or set aside may within fifteen (15) days after the entry of such order file with the commission a written petition for rehearing, which shall specify in detail the grounds for the relief sought in the petition and authorities in support.

Acts 1953, ch. 162, § 13 (Williams, § 5501.36); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-214; Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 9; 2017, ch. 94, § 50.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “commission” for “authority” throughout the section.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

Law Reviews.

Symposium -- Memphis in the Law: The Process of Determining What Process is Due: The Continuing Saga of Memphis Light, Gas & Water Division v. Craft, 436 U.S. 1 (1978) (Donna Harkness), 41 U. Mem. L. Rev. 745 (2011).

65-2-115. Effect of filing of petition for rehearing.

The filing of a petition for rehearing shall not suspend or delay the effective date of the commission's order, and the order shall take effect on the date fixed by the commission and shall continue in effect unless and until the petition is granted or until the order is superseded, modified, or set aside in a manner provided by law.

Acts 1953, ch. 162, § 14 (Williams, § 5501.37); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-215; Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 9; 2017, ch. 94, § 50.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “commission” for “authority” throughout the section.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

Law Reviews.

Symposium — Memphis in the Law: The Process of Determining What Process is Due: The Continuing Saga of Memphis Light, Gas & Water Division v. Craft, 436 U.S. 1 (1978) (Donna Harkness), 41 U. Mem. L. Rev. 745 (2011).

65-2-116. Grounds for rehearing.

A petition for rehearing will lie only for the following grounds:

Some material error of law committed by the commission;

Some material error of fact committed by the commission; or

The discovery of new evidence sufficiently strong to reverse or modify the commission's order, and which could not have been previously discovered by due diligence.

Acts 1953, ch. 162, § 15 (Williams, § 5501.38); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-216; Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 9; 2017, ch. 94, §§ 50, 82.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “commission” for “authority” twice and “commission's” for “authority's” in (3).

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

Law Reviews.

Symposium -- Memphis in the Law: The Process of Determining What Process is Due: The Continuing Saga of Memphis Light, Gas & Water Division v. Craft, 436 U.S. 1 (1978) (Donna Harkness), 41 U. Mem. L. Rev. 745 (2011).

65-2-117. Replies to petitions for rehearing.

Copies of a petition for rehearing shall be served on all parties of record who may file replies to such petition.

Acts 1953, ch. 162, § 16 (Williams, § 5501.39); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-217.

Law Reviews.

Symposium -- Memphis in the Law: The Process of Determining What Process is Due: The Continuing Saga of Memphis Light, Gas & Water Division v. Craft, 436 U.S. 1 (1978) (Donna Harkness), 41 U. Mem. L. Rev. 745 (2011).

65-2-118. Disposition of petitions for rehearing.

The commission may, in its discretion, set the petition down for hearing or enter an order with reference to the petition without a hearing; provided, that in any event the commission shall dispose of the petition within thirty (30) days after filing thereof. If the commission enters no order disposing of the petition within the thirty-day period, the petition shall be deemed to have been denied as of the expiration of the thirty-day period.

Acts 1953, ch. 162, § 17 (Williams, § 5501.40); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-218; Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 9; 2017, ch. 94, § 50.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “commission” for “authority” throughout the section.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

Law Reviews.

Symposium -- Memphis in the Law: The Process of Determining What Process is Due: The Continuing Saga of Memphis Light, Gas & Water Division v. Craft, 436 U.S. 1 (1978) (Donna Harkness), 41 U. Mem. L. Rev. 745 (2011).

65-2-119. Proceedings upon granting of petition for rehearing.

Upon the granting of a petition for rehearing by the commission, the commission shall set the matter for rehearing as soon as practicable. In disposing of matters on rehearing, the commission shall have all the powers and shall follow the procedures of the chancery courts with reference to the disposition of rehearings in such courts, except as otherwise provided in this chapter.

Acts 1953, ch. 162, § 18 (Williams, § 5501.41); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-219; Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 9; 2017, ch. 94, § 50.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “commission” for “authority” throughout the section.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

Law Reviews.

Symposium -- Memphis in the Law: The Process of Determining What Process is Due: The Continuing Saga of Memphis Light, Gas & Water Division v. Craft, 436 U.S. 1 (1978) (Donna Harkness), 41 U. Mem. L. Rev. 745 (2011).

65-2-120. Conflict of laws.

If, in any case to which this chapter applies, this chapter conflicts with any other law in this state, this chapter shall control.

Acts 1953, ch. 162, § 31 (Williams, § 5501.54); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-231.

Compiler's Notes. Section 4-5-103(b) of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act provides that where there is a conflict between the provisions of that act and § 65-2-110, § 65-2-110 controls, but that in any other case of conflict between the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act and any statute, whether general or specific, the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act shall control. See also United Inter-Mountain Tel. Co. v. Public Serv. Comm'n, 555 S.W.2d 389 (Tenn. 1977); Public Serv. Comm'n v. General Tel. Co., 555 S.W.2d 395 (Tenn. 1977).

Law Reviews.

Symposium -- Memphis in the Law: The Process of Determining What Process is Due: The Continuing Saga of Memphis Light, Gas & Water Division v. Craft, 436 U.S. 1 (1978) (Donna Harkness), 41 U. Mem. L. Rev. 745 (2011).

65-2-121. Liberal construction of chapter.

This chapter shall not be construed as in derogation of the common law, but shall be given a liberal construction, and any doubt as to the existence or the extent of a power conferred shall be resolved in favor of the existence of the power.

Acts 1953, ch. 162, § 32 (Williams, § 5501.55); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-232.

Law Reviews.

Symposium -- Memphis in the Law: The Process of Determining What Process is Due: The Continuing Saga of Memphis Light, Gas & Water Division v. Craft, 436 U.S. 1 (1978) (Donna Harkness), 41 U. Mem. L. Rev. 745 (2011).

65-2-122. Establishment of optional services purchased by regulated entities or unregulated service providers — Cost-based charges for services — Election to use services.

The commission may establish optional services that may be purchased by regulated entities or other unregulated service providers, which are related to the exercise, administration or enforcement of jurisdiction delegated to the commission by state or federal law.

The establishment of charges for services described in subsection (a) shall be cost-based.

No charge for services as established in this section shall be applied to any party that does not expressly elect to use such services, and no party shall be required to elect to use such optional services as a condition of initiating any case before the commission.

Acts 2013, ch. 245, § 3; 2017, ch. 94, § 50.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “commission” for “authority” twice in (a) and at the end of (c).

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.